Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.110

Committees—Reference to include successor. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

Any reference in this chapter to a committee of the legislature including the joint legislative audit and review committee shall also refer to the successor of that committee.

[ 1996 c 288 s 47; 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 11.]